external/rhvoice/src/scripts/Spanish/include/phon/stress.foma
# Copyright (C) 2024-2026  Mateo Cedillo <angelitomateocedillo@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

source include/variables.foma

# One of references that helped a lot: https://www.reddit.com/r/Spanish/comments/1336w1x/stress_pattern_on_espa%C3%B1ol/

define StressedVowel [a1 | e1 | i1 | o1 | u1] ; 
define UnstressedVowel a0|e0|i0|o0|u0 ; 
define vowel  UnstressedVowel  | StressedVowel ; 
define pc   \vowel ; 
define noStress UnstressedVowel | pc ; 
define stresses [
	a0:a1|
	e0:e1|
	i0:i1|
	o0:o1 (u0)|
	u0:u1
] ; 

define stresses2 
stresses | [o0 u0]:[o1 u0] | [o0 i0]:[o1 i0] | [e0 i0]:[e1 i0] ; 
define MonosylStress stresses -> || 
# Monosyllables in spanish always have the stress in the only one vowel between first consonants, and last consonants.
.#. (Consonant+) _ (Consonant+) (IVrbS|IVrbP) .#. ; 

define SpanishStress stresses2 @-> || 
# In words that end in a vowel, n or s, the stress generally falls on the penultimate syllable.
.#. noStress* _ pc* UnstressedVowel (n^<3|s^<3) (IVrbS|IVrbP|[adv [m [e1|e0] n t e0]]) .#. ; 

define SpanishStress2 stresses2 @-> || 
# If a word ends with a consonant, the stress falls in the last vowel of the syllable. Example, Español.
.#. noStress+ _ Consonant+ ([adv [m e1 n t e0]]) .#. ; 

define unstress [
a:a0|
e:e0|
i:i0|
o:o0|
u:u0
] @-> || _ ;
